Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2303.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-172, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-172. Powers and duties; administering oaths; appointment of deputy state treasurer; conflicts of interest; definitions A. The state treasurer shall: 1. Authenticate writings and documents certified by the state treasurer with the seal of the state treasurer's office. 2. Receive and keep in secure custody all monies that belong to this state and that are not required to be received and kept by some other person. 3. File and keep the documentation delivered to the treasurer when monies are deposited into the treasury. 4. Deliver to each person depositing money into the treasury a confirmation showing the date, amount and depositing agency and shall provide a unique identifying number for each confirmation. 5. Pay warrants drawn by the department of administration in the order in which they are presented. 6. Keep an account of all monies received and disbursed, and keep separate accounts of the different funds and appropriations of monies. 7. Give information in writing as to the condition of the state treasury, or on any subject relating to the duties of the treasurer, at the request of a member of the legislature. 8. Deliver to the governor and the department of administration, monthly, an accurate statement of receipts and expenditures of public monies for the preceding month, containing a complete exhibit of all the public monies received and paid from the state treasury, showing, under separate heads, on what accounts and from what sources received, and for what particular object or service the monies have been paid. The treasurer shall deliver to the governor a similar statement on or before November 1 each year for the preceding fiscal year. The statement shall also include an estimate of the invested balance, including the state general fund share of that balance as of June 30 of the preceding fiscal year.  The statements are public records available for inspection at the office of the state treasurer. 9. On or before February 1 of each year, in coordination with the director of the department of administration, submit to the joint legislative budget committee a report explaining any differences between the department of administration's estimate of the previous fiscal year's state general fund ending balance submitted pursuant to section 35-131 and the state treasurer's estimate of the invested balance, including the state general fund share of that balance as of June 30 of the previous fiscal year submitted pursuant to paragraph 8 of this subsection. 10. Exercise those specific powers of the surveyor-general as a member of the selection board established under section 37-202. 11. Administer AZ529, Arizona's education savings plan established by title 15, chapter 14, article 7. 12.  Promote and raise awareness of financial literacy to residents of this state. B. The state treasurer may administer all oaths prescribed by law in matters touching the duties of the office of the state treasurer, subject to chapter 4, article 4 of this title, may appoint a deputy state treasurer, may qualify and select investment managers or advisors pursuant to section 35-318 and shall perform other duties required by other laws of this state. C. Employees of the state treasurer's office are subject to chapter 4, article 4 of this title.  For prospective or current employees of the state treasurer's office, the state treasurer may: 1. Require the submission of a full set of fingerprints for the purpose of obtaining a state and federal criminal records check pursuant to section 41-1750 and Public Law 92-544.  The department of public safety may exchange this fingerprint data with the federal bureau of investigation. 2. Conduct a periodic review of credit standing. D. The state treasurer shall only invest in safe investments that prioritize safety and principal preservation before high returns, liquidity and yield. E. The state TREASURER may not do any of the following: 1. use any insider information that is obtained while performing official duties to KNOWINGLY benefit another party or for any personal gain or for the personal gain of any family member of the state treasurer. The interests of the state treasurer's office shall take precedence over any personal interests of the state treasurer. 2. Invest in speculative investments. F. For the purposes of this section: 1. "insider information" includes any investment decisions, any information regarding any internal and external investment programs or any advantageous investment opportunities that are not available to the public, and any other negotiations, proposed transactions or business information. 2. "Speculative investments" means high-risk financial investments on assets whose value is expected to increase significantly in the short term and are often based on future potential rather than current income-generating ability. END_STATUTE